apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON N_КИ_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КИ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

!! Lative 
LEXICON N_КАЛ-LAT
 N_КАЛ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК-LAT
 N_ЛАК ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КИТ-LAT
 N_КИТ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ОШ-LAT
 N_ОШ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС-LAT
 N_КЛАСС ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО-LAT
 N_ПАНГО ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ-LAT
 N_ТИНГЕ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КИ-LAT
 N_КИ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КУДО-LAT
 N_КУДО ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

!! Vocative 
LEXICON N_КАЙ_HUMVOC
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<der_voc_кай%>@P.POS.N@:0000@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_АЙ_HUMVOC
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<der_voc_ай%>@P.POS.N@:0000@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_HUMVOC
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<der_voc%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_КАЙ_KINVOC
%<n%>%<sem_kin%>%<der_voc_кай%>@P.POS.N@:0000@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_АЙ_KINVOC
%<n%>%<sem_kin%>%<der_voc_ай%>@P.POS.N@:0000@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_KINVOC
%<n%>%<sem_kin%>%<der_voc%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ # ;

!! Common Nouns 

LEXICON N_КАЛ
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_КАЛ ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>@P.POS.N@:%>Н1е@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КАЛ
 N_КАЛ-Derivation ;
 N_КАЛ-Def-Declension ;
 _КАЛ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ_SUB
%<use_sub%>: N_КАЛ ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ-PL
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ _КАЛ-Indef-Declension-PL ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ-PL_SUB
%<use_sub%>: N_КАЛ-PL ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_ЛАК ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>@P.POS.N@:%>Н1е@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК-PL
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ _КАЛ-Indef-Declension-PL ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_КЕЖ
 NMN_КАЛ ;
LEXICON	 NMN_МЕКШ
 NMN_ОШ ;
LEXICON  NMN_ЛЕВКС
 NMN_ОШ ;
LEXICON  NMN_ПИЗЁЛКС
 NMN_ОШ ;
LEXICON  NMN_УНДО
 NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON NMN_ЛАК
 N_ЛАК-Derivation ;
 N_ЛАК-Def-Declension ;
 _ЛАК-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_КИТ
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_КИТ ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>@P.POS.N@:%>Н1е@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КИТ
 N_КИТ-Derivation ;
 N_КИТ-Def-Declension ;
 _КИТ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_КИТ-PL
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ _КИТ-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_КЛАСС ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>@P.POS.N@:%>Н1е@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КЛАСС
 N_КЛАСС-Derivation ;
 N_ОШ-Def-Declension ;
 _ОШ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_SUB
%<use_sub%>: N_ОШ ;

LEXICON N_ОШ
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_ОШ ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>@P.POS.N@:%>Н1е@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ОШ
 N_ОШ-Derivation ;
 N_ОШ-Def-Declension ;
 _ОШ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_ОШ-PL !! This needs checking 2013-03-27
 N_ОШ-Derivation ;
 NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
 _ОШ-Indef-Declension-PL ;
 N_ОШ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_ОШ-PL
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_ОШ-Derivation ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ _ОШ-Indef-Declension-PL ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_ОШ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_ИЕ
:е N_КУДО ;
%<use_sub%>:й N_КАЛ ;

LEXICON N_ТЕШТЕ
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_ТЕШТЕ ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>@P.POS.N@:%>ке@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ТЕШТЕ
 NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_ТИНГЕ ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>0@P.POS.N@:%>Ы2не@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ТИНГЕ
 NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ-PL
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>0@P.POS.N@:%>О1@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ _ПАНГО-Indef-Declension-PL ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_ЧУВТО
 N_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_SUB
%<use_sub%>: N_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО
!! панго:панг
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_ПАНГО ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>0@P.POS.N@:%>Ы2не@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ПАНГО
 N_ПАНГО-Derivation ;
 N_ПАНГО-Def-Declension ;
 _ПАНГО-Indef-Declension ;
 N_ПАНГО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON DV-N_
%<v%>%<der_n_ома%>: NMN_КУДО ;

! This might be moved to exceptions 2012-11-21
LEXICON N_КИ
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_КИ ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>0@P.POS.N@:%>Ы2не@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КИ
 NMN_КУДО ;
:я PRL-INDEF ;
:я SG-PRL-DEF ;
%<sg%>%<cx_prl%>:ява PossPX1 ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_SUB
%<use_sub%>: N_КУДО ;

LEXICON N_КУДО
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;
%<n%>%<der_dim_НЕ%>0@P.POS.N@:%>Ы2не@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КУДО
 N_КУДО-Derivation ;
 NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
 _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_КУДО-PL !! This needs checking 2013-03-27
 N_КУДО-Derivation ;
 NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
 _КУДО-Indef-Declension-PL ;
 N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_КУДО-PL
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_КУДО-Derivation ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ _КУДО-Indef-Declension-PL ;
%<n%>@P.POS.N@:0@P.POS.N@ N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!Does this need a diminutive?
LEXICON N_АВИДЕМ
%<n%>%<coll_assoc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;


! ========== !
!! DERIVATION 
! ========== !

LEXICON N_ЛАК-Derivation
 N_КАЛ-Derivation ;
%<use_sub_phoninfl%>%<cx_tra%>%<indef%>:%>KLossкс%> N2Dem-SE ;
%<use_sub_phoninfl%>%<cx_tra%>%<indef%>:%>KLossкс%>О1%> N2Dem-SE ;


LEXICON N_КИТ-Derivation
 N_КАЛ-Derivation;

LEXICON Nouns
ки N_КИ ;
куз N_КАЛ ;
авушай:авушай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
алиментт:алимент N_КИТ-PL  "elatusapu, lapseneläke" ;
бабай:бабай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
бабаозкс:бабаозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
баранозкс:баранозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
бурлак:бурлак N_ЛАК  "(hist.) burlakki, lotjanhinaaja, lautturi" ;
вадринекай:вадринекай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
вайгельсант:вайгель#сан N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
вальмавалдо:вальмавалд N_ПАНГО  "" ;
вальмапелцят:вальма#пелця N_КУДО-PL  "" ;
валяиця:валяиця N_КУДО  "" ;
ванынекай:ванынекай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
вармамевть:вармамевть N_КИТ  "purje" ;
васоньпеельть:васоньпеель N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
ваце:ваць N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
ведьбайге:ведьбайг N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
ведьпандо:ведьбанд N_ПАНГО_SUB  "" ;
ведьпарсей:ведьбарсей N_КАЛ_SUB  "" ;
ведьпарь:ведьбарь N_КАЛ_SUB  "" ;
ведьпотмакс:ведь#потмакс N_ОШ  "" ;
ведьпря:ведьбря N_КУДО_SUB  "" ;
вежавай:вежавай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
вексель:вексель N_КАЛ  "vekseli" ;
велеозкс:велеозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
велеозкс:велеоскс N_ОШ_SUB  "" ;
венчакай:венчакай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "morsian" ;
вигинепейть:вигинепей N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
вирькужо:вирь#кужо N_КУДО_PLC  "" ;
гигерь:гигирь N_КАЛ_SUB  "tuohi" ;
государства:государства N_КУДО-LAT  "valtio; valtakunta" ;
граблят:грабля N_КУДО-PL  "" ;
гуйпочко:гуйпочк N_ПАНГО  "" ;
дирякай:дирякай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
диск:диск N_ЛАК  "kiekko" ;
документ:документ N_КИТ  "dokumentti, asiapaperi, henkilöpaperi" ;
дугай:дугай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
дугакай:дугакай N_КАЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
дурацьке:дурацьке N_КУДО  "" ;
заклад:заклад N_КАЛ  "" ;
ие:и N_ИЕ  "vuosi" ;
извозчик:извозчик N_ЛАК  "vuokra-ajuri, vossikka; vuokrahevonen" ;
ишмеэльде:ишмеэльдь N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
кавазудалкс:кавазудалкс N_ОШ  "" ;
кандолазт:кандолаз N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
канзюрсельме:канзюрсельм N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
каторга:каторга N_КУДО-LAT  "pakkotyö(t), pakkotyövankila, pakkotyöleiri" ;
кевкат:кевка N_КУДО-PL  "" ;
кедьпе:кедьбе N_КУДО_SUB  "" ;
кедьпеште:кедьпешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
кенгелькай:кенгелькай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
кендерькундо:кендерькунд N_ПАНГО  "" ;
керамзит:керамзит N_КИТ  "" ;
керемедьозкс:керемедьозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
керетьозкс:керетьозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
керосинчине:керосин#чине N_КУДО  "" ;
керьме:керьм N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
ки:ки N_КИ  "tie, matka; viiva" ;
ки:ки N_КИ_PLC  "" ;
кино:кино N_КУДО_PLC  "elokuva" ;
кирдема:кирдема DV-N_  "kärsivällisyys, maltti" ;
киртыж:киртыж N_ОШ  "" ;
кладь:кладь N_КАЛ  "" ;
колпак:колпак N_ЛАК  "lakki, myssy; kupu" ;
контрразведка:контрразведка N_КУДО-LAT  "vastavakoilu" ;
куншка:куншка N_КУДО_PLC  "keski(kohta), keskusta" ;
курокст:курокс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
куропатка:куропатка N_КУДО_SUB  "peltopyy" ;
кшниваце:кшниваць N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
лавсьведьме:лавсьведьм N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
лавсьчувт:лавсьчувт N_КИТ  "" ;
лакавкс:лакавкс N_ОШ  "" ;
лаконизма:лаконизма N_КУДО  "" ;
ламарьчувто:ламарьчувт N_ПАНГО  "" ;
лей:лей N_КАЛ-LAT  "joki" ;
лекшат:лекша N_КУДО-PL  "" ;
лелякай:лелякай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
лёмнармунь:лёмнармунь N_КАЛ  "" ;
мамай:мамай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
мелькть:мельк N_ТИНГЕ-PL  "(mon.) keuhkot" ;
милиция:милиция N_КУДО-LAT  "miliisilaitos" ;
мирде:мирдь N_ТЕШТЕ  "aviomies" ;
моцькаудалкст:моцькаудалкс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
мушкозяс:мушкозяс N_ОШ  "" ;
мушкокерьме:мушко#керьм N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
муюк:муюк N_ЛАК  "" ;
неимат:неимат N_КИТ  "" ;
ноготт:ногот N_КИТ-PL  "" ;
нуемаланго:нуемаланг N_ПАНГО  "" ;
нумолкай:нумолкай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
обозтеште:обозтешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
ождят:ождя N_КУДО-PL  "" ;
оинекай:оинекай N_КАЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
оля:оля N_КУДО-LAT  "vapaus" ;
отпуск:отпуск N_ЛАК-LAT  "loma; anto, antaminen; myynti; myöntäminen" ;
ошкужо:ош#кужо N_КУДО_PLC  "" ;
пай:пай N_КАЛ-LAT  "osuus; osuusmaksu" ;
паксяозкс:паксяозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
пан:пан N_КАЛ  "" ;
панарт:панар N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
парсейведьме:парсейведьм N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
пекарня:пекарня N_КУДО_PLC  "leipomo" ;
пельчас:пельчас N_ОШ  "" ;
пенерьвакай:пенерьвакай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
пера:пера N_КУДО  "" ;
печказ:печкас N_ОШ_SUB  "" ;
пизёлчувто:пизёл#чувт N_ПАНГО  "" ;
пилявкст:пилявкс N_ОШ-PL  "sahajauhot, sahanpurut" ;
пиневаце:пиневаць N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
пинемеямкскеть:пинемеямкскеть N_КИТ  "" ;
пондельник:пондельник N_ЛАК  "maanantai" ;
понкст:понкс N_ОШ-PL  "housut" ;
попай:попай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
потмо% оршамот:потмо% оршамо N_КИТ-PL  "" ;
праздник:праздник N_ЛАК-LAT  "juhla" ;
прогресс:прогресс N_КЛАСС  "edistys" ;
прякужо:пря#кужо N_КУДО_PLC  "" ;
пудкев:пудкев N_КАЛ  "" ;
пулопелькст:пуло#пелькс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
пупиуське:пупиуськ N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
разведка:разведка N_КУДО-LAT  "tiedustelu; etsintä, tutkimus" ;
рейтузат:рейтузат N_КИТ  "" ;
розень% товт:розень% тов N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
ряцозкс:ряцозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
салмат:салма N_КУДО-PL  "" ;
сваткай:сваткай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
совет:совет N_КИТ-LAT  "neuvosto" ;
совещания:совещания N_КУДО-LAT  "neuvottelu, neuvonpito" ;
соотечественник:соотечественник N_ЛАК  "maanmies, saman maan kansalainen" ;
столанго:столанг N_ПАНГО  "" ;
сувар:сувар N_КАЛ  "" ;
сувтемешка:сувтемешка N_КУДО  "" ;
сурбунапалкат:сурбунапалкат N_КИТ  "" ;
суффикс:суффикс N_ОШ  "suffiksi" ;
сэдькуншка:сэдь#куншка N_КУДО_PLC  "" ;
сэдьпе:сэдьбе N_КУДО_SUB  "" ;
сэрьге:сэрьг N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
сювапулокст:сюва#пулокс N_ОШ-PL  "" ;
тетидем:тетиде N_АВИДЕМ  "" ;
тетидень:тетидень N_АВИДЕМ  "" ;
тетякай:тетякай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
теште:тешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "tähti" ;
тустт:туст N_КИТ-PL  "" ;
умарьчувто:умарьчувт N_ПАНГО  "" ;
урьвай:урьвай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
урьвинекай:урьвинекай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
ферма:ферма N_КУДО_PLC  "farmi" ;
хозмаг:хозмаг N_КАЛ  "" ;
цетьверьк:цетьверьк N_ЛАК  "torstai" ;
чамаумарть:чамаумарь N_КАЛ-PL  "" ;
чаулай:чаулай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
чаулкай:чаулкай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "" ;
чиньчарамо:чинь#жарамо N_КУДО_SUB  "" ;
чиньчарамо:чин#жарамо N_КУДО_SUB  "" ;
чиньчарамо:чинь#жарамо N_КУДО_SUB  "" ;
чиньчарамо:чин#жарамо N_КУДО_SUB  "" ;
чиярмакт:чи#ярмак N_ЛАК-PL  "" ;
шабракай:шабракай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
шахматт:шахмат N_КИТ-PL  "" ;
штанаведьметь:штана#ведьме N_КУДО-PL  "" ;
экскурсия:экскурсия N_КУДО-LAT  "opintoretki" ;
экш:экш N_ОШ-LAT  "" ;
энергомашиностроения:энергомашиностроения N_КУДО  "" ;
юртозкс:юртоскс N_ОШ_SUB  "" ;
ялгай:ялгай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
ялгакай:ялгакай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "" ;
ярсамкс:ярцамкс N_ОШ  "" ;
ёртовкст:ёртовкс N_ОШ-PL  "jätteet" ;
